Georgia, session 2025_26, SB343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 39-6-2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to age verification
of account holders, minors, and information relating to available content censorship or
moderation features, is amended by revising subsection (c) as follows:
"(c) No provider of a social media platform shall permit a minor aged 14 years or younger
to be an account holder. No provider of a social media platform shall permit a minor older
than 14 years of age to be an account holder unless such provider obtains the express
consent of such minor's parent or guardian. Acceptable methods of obtaining express
consent from a parent or guardian include:
S. B. 343
- 1 -

LC 56 0265
(1) Providing a form for the minor's parent or guardian to sign and return to the social
media platform by common carrier, facsimile, email, or scanning;
(2) Providing a toll-free telephone number for the minor's parent or guardian to call to
consent;
(3) Coordinating a call with the minor's parent or guardian using videoconferencing
technology;
(4) Collecting information related to the minor's parent's or guardian's government issued
identification or financial or payment card information and deleting such information
after confirming the identity of the parent or guardian;
(5) Allowing the minor's parent or guardian to provide consent by responding to an email
and taking additional steps to verify the parent's or guardian's identity; and
(6) Any other commercially reasonable method of obtaining consent using available
technology."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 343
- 2 -